Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2490.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 67 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8103. Waiver of subrogation. (a) General rule.--A provision in a service provider contract in which a county agency or municipal government entity seeks to nullify the right of an entity insuring or otherwise providing liability coverage for the county agency or municipal government entity to seek compensation from the county agency or municipal government entity to recoup costs from a claim for liability shall be void as against public policy and unenforceable. The provisions voided shall include, but are not limited to, clauses that waive subrogation rights.(b) Definitions.--For purposes of this section, the term 123456789101112131415161718 "service provider contract" shall mean a contract, agreement or understanding regarding the provision of services subject to regulation under 55 Pa. Code Pt. V (relating to children, youth and families manual).Section 2. The addition of 67 Pa.C.S. § 8103 shall apply to service provider contracts entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2490PN3366 - 2 - 12345678